District of Columbia statutes.
2-1311

Established.

There is established an Office on Latino Affairs. The Office shall provide within the District of Columbia government a single administrative unit, responsible to the Mayor, to administer such programs as shall be delegated to it by the Mayor, the Council, and the Commission, to promote the welfare of the Latino community.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title III, § 301, 23 DCR 2543
Oct. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-42, § 9(c)(1), 28 DCR 3425
1973 Ed., § 6-1911.
1981 Ed., § 1-2311.
This section is referenced in § 1-603.01 and § 2-1302.
Administration, merit system, “subordinate agency” defined to include Office of Latino Affairs, see § 1-603.01.